src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-wwqdwg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - ȭʼdõg: # Noun 160 'eng /est õhtu/fin' - full paradigm
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Nom: [ȭʼdõg, ȭdõg]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Gen: [ȭʼdõg, ȭdõg]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Par: [ȭʼdõgt, ȭdõgt]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Dat: [ȭʼdõgõn, ȭdõgõn]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Ins: [ȭʼdõgõks, ȭdõgõks]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Ill: [ȭʼdõgõ, ȭdõgõ]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Sg+Ela: [ȭʼdõgst, ȭdõgst]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Nom: [ȭʼdõgõd, ȭdõgõd]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Gen: [ȭʼdõgõd, ȭdõgõd]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Par: [ȭʼdõgidi, ȭdõgidi]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Dat: [ȭʼdõgõdõn, ȭdõgõdõn]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Ins: [ȭʼdõgõdõks, ȭdõgõdõks]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Ill: [ȭʼdõgiž, ȭdõgiž]
     ȭʼdõg+N+Pl+Ela: [ȭʼdõgist, ȭdõgist]
